Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Penalties

190.990.
Penalties.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, any person who violates or causes, aids, or abets any violation of any provision of KRS

190.010

to

190.080

and KRS Chapter 190A, as such provisions apply, respectively, to new motor vehicle dealers, new recreational vehicle dealers, manufacturers, distributors, factory branches, or factory representatives, or any order, rule or regulation lawfully issued pursuant to authority granted by KRS

190.010

to

190.080

shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both. Any person who violates paragraphs (l), (m) or (n) of subsection (1) of KRS

190.040

may also be subject to a suspension or revocation sentence of not more than a year effective only in the territory formerly served by the unfairly canceled dealer, except that in a metropolitan area serviced by several dealers handling the same motor vehicle or recreational vehicle, the suspension or revocation order shall not be applicable to the remaining dealers.

Any person who willfully and intentionally violates any provision of KRS

190.090

to

190.140

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

A willful violation of KRS

190.100

or

190.110

by any person shall bar his recovery of any finance charge, delinquency, or collection charge on the retail installment contract involved.

Any person who willfully violates KRS

190.270

to

190.320

shall be subject to a penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation, which may be recovered on behalf of the Commonwealth by the Attorney General.

Any person who willfully and fraudulently gives a false statement as to the total and actual consideration paid for a motor vehicle under KRS

138.450

shall be guilty of a Class D felony and shall be fined not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) per offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 105, § 6; 1956, ch. 161, § 9; 1968, ch. 152, § 125; 1976, ch. 246, § 10; 1984, ch. 357, § 14, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 600, § 8, effective April 14, 1998; 2014, ch. 27, § 25, effective January 1, 2015.

190.991.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

186.695

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned for a term not to exceed six (6) months, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 120, § 9; 1974, ch. 76, § 14.